Between Comey and Trump, it looks like we have two people describing the same events, and both are liars. This makes it difficult to figure out what was actually going on. Still, we can make a decent guess at what was really going on. The above timeline is helpful.

A few things about Trump provide some context.

First, Trump is obsessed with the press, especially for coverage about himself:


http://www.businessinsider.com/the-art-of-the-deal-donald-trump-leadership-2017-1/#he-learned-how-to-be-a-force-in-the-public-arena-from-roy-cohn-3
	8 key insights from Trump's book 'The Art of the Deal' reveal how the president thinks

	...He's long had an obsession with the press.

	...Trump developed a habit early in his career of closely monitoring all media coverage of himself and his properties, and often wrote letters to reporters and writers when he disagreed with their criticisms. "My people keep telling me I shouldn't write letters like this to critics," he writes. "The way I see it, critics get to say what they want about my work, so why shouldn't I be able to say what I want about theirs?"


http://www.businessinsider.com/the-art-of-the-deal-donald-trump-leadership-2017-1/#this-includes-making-the-most-of-controversy-and-drama-6
	Trump also learned to make the most of a disastrous story, as when he made the decision to destroy a few sculptures when he made way for Trump Tower in 1979, not expecting an outcry from art lovers and designers.

	"Even though the publicity was almost entirely negative, there was a great deal of it, and that drew a tremendous amount of attention to Trump Tower," he writes. "Almost immediately we saw an upsurge in the sales of apartments. I'm not saying that's a good thing, and in truth it probably says something perverse about the culture we live in. But I'm a businessman, and I learned a lesson from that experience: good publicity is preferable to bad, but from a bottom-line perspective, bad publicity is sometimes better than no publicity at all. Controversy, in short, sells."


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/donald-trump-alter-ego-barron/2016/05/12/02ac99ec-16fe-11e6-aa55-670cabef46e0_story.html
	Donald Trump masqueraded as publicist to brag about himself 

	...A “John Baron,” described as a “vice-president of the Trump organization,” appeared in a front-page New York Times article as early as 1980, defending Trump’s decision to destroy sculptures on the facade of the Bonwit Teller department store building, the Fifth Avenue landmark he was demolishing to make way for his Trump Tower. Barron was quoted variously as a “Trump spokesman,” “Trump executive” or “Trump representative” in New York magazine, The Washington Post and other publications.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/07/03/trump-fake-news-white-house-240196
	Trump: 'Fake News will be forced to discuss' White House accomplishments


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/881983493533822976
	Dow hit a new intraday all-time high! I wonder whether or not the Fake News Media will so report?
	2:10 PM - 3 Jul 2017 


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/trump-eventually-media-will-be-forced-to-focus-on-my-success/article/2627670
	Trump: Eventually media 'will be forced' to focus on my success

	President Trump said Monday that the media eventually "will be forced" to focus on his administration's accomplishments, instead of continuing what he has called unfair coverage.

	"At some point the Fake News will be forced to discuss our great jobs numbers, strong economy, success with ISIS, the border & so much else!" Trump tweeted Monday while at his golf resort in Bedminster, N.J.

		At some point the Fake News will be forced to discuss our great jobs numbers, strong economy, success with ISIS, the border & so much else!— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) July 3, 2017

	Trump's tweets were the focus of the weekend news cycle after he said CNN "has finally been exposed" as "garbage journalism." He later shared an altered video that showed him tackling a CNN character in a Wrestlemania skit.

	Trump also said on Sunday that the "dishonest media" would not prevent him from carrying out his agenda.

	The continued attacks on reporters soaked up much of the discussion on Sunday morning news shows.


Trump watches press reports about himself and sometimes responds publicly. Often he will try to manipulate reporting about himself. He is said to be very image concious.

Otherwise, Trump is no stranger to coercion and threats, veiled or otherwise:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/donald-trump-alter-ego-barron/2016/05/12/02ac99ec-16fe-11e6-aa55-670cabef46e0_story.html
	From the start of his career as a builder in New York, Trump worked the press. He believed in carrots and sticks, showering reporters with praise, then pivoting to a threat to sue them if they wrote something he considered inaccurate.


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/politics/ct-trump-eminent-domain-lawyer-20160325-story.html
	Donald Trump had a problem.

	He'd met two people who seemed as stubborn as him: a feisty widow whose house stood in the way of his Atlantic City casino expansion, and her attorney.

	Trump's approach struck his adversaries as brazen. Even though the widow was suing him for damaging her house, Trump called her attorney, Glenn Zeitz, and, according to Zeitz, tried to hire him for a potentially more lucrative case.

	...At one point, Trump's team pushed city officials to condemn her house and tear it down.


http://articles.latimes.com/1996-02-25/news/mn-39769_1_trump-plaza
	Elderly Woman Battles Casinos Over Her Home
	February 25, 1996

	Even with giant casino hotels dwarfing her crumbling three-story home, Vera Coking refused to sell.

	...Coking watched from the outside as Donald J. Trump's newest casino project, a 22-story addition to neighboring Trump Plaza Hotel and Casino, opened Feb. 16, next door to the home where she has lived for 35 years.

	Trump lost out on a bid to have the lot seized in an eminent domain proceeding. So he built around her.

	Coking is surrounded on three sides by the casino hotels.

	Coking, whose wood-framed house is an eyesore with peeling white paint and a collapsed railing on the second-floor deck, lives on Social Security. Her health is failing, and she is in the process of fighting a condemnation action by the city.

	"If they give me the right price, I would sell," said Coking, who appears to be in her 70s.

	Her lawyer, Glenn A. Zeitz, continues to push Trump to buy her out. In recent talks, Zeitz said Trump's lawyers indicated that they would not pay more than $1 million. He said the house and lot are worth at least $2 million.

	Trump's employees have two words for the 5-foot-5 woman living at 127 Columbia Place. They call her "Trump's ulcer."

	"This is not an innocent little darling we're dealing with here," Trump said recently. "This is a tough, cunning, crafty person who has purposely allowed that property to go to hell, right at the foot of the entrance to Atlantic City, so she can get a higher price."

	Trump said he doesn't want the property badly enough to pay Coking's price.


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/nationworld/politics/ct-trump-eminent-domain-lawyer-20160325-story.html
	Still, Zeitz told Trump he wanted to give him something.

	Zeitz pulled out a baseball. He told Trump that when he first got involved in the case, the developer's lawyers told him that the Trump organization "plays hardball." He wanted Trump to know that he played hardball, too.

	Trump took the ball in his hand, Zeitz said. It had an inscription: "From 'The Vera.' To 'The Donald.' "

	The Donald handed it back.

	The next day Trump called Zeitz at the lawyer's weekend home in Avalon, New Jersey.

	...Trump pressed Zeitz to tell his client to take the deal and forget about both lawsuits. Then Trump added a wrinkle. He began talking about an Atlantic City tunnel project that a rival developer - casino mogul Steve Wynn - wanted built. The endeavor was similar to Coking's case in this respect: It would use eminent domain to buy out homeowners. But it was different in this respect: Trump wanted to block the project to prevent his rival from getting what he wanted

	...But he was stunned at what Trump said next. "He said to me that he wanted to hire me to represent Lillian Bryant and other people on the street," Zeitz recalled. "I would be getting hired by him to represent his interests."

	...Zeitz told Trump that he had to be loyal to his client and that it would be a conflict of interest to take the case while he was involved in Coking's lawsuit against the developer. Trump countered that he should rush a settlement of the Coking case so he'd no longer have a conflict, according to Zeitz.

	Zeitz said, "No."

	The next time they talked was in an Atlantic City courtroom.


http://time.com/4465744/donald-trump-undocumented-workers/
	In the summer of 1980, Donald Trump faced a big problem. For six months, undocumented Polish laborers had been clearing the future site of Trump Tower, his signature real estate project on Manhattan's Fifth Avenue, where he now lives, maintains his private offices and hosts his presidential campaign.

	The men were putting in 12-hour shifts with inadequate safety equipment at subpar wages that their contractor paid sporadically, if at all. A lawyer for many of the Poles demanded that the workers be paid or else he would serve Trump with a lien on the property. 

	...Worried the Poles would never get paid, Szabo put a second and third lien on the property. On Aug. 8, he called Macari and told him that because Trump had been paying the Poles, he was legally their employer. That meant that under the Fair Labor Standards Act, Trump couldn't sell any space in the tower until Szabo's clients were paid.

	Forty-five minutes later, Szabo testified, he received a call from a man who identified himself as a Mr. Barron from Trump's legal department, who said Trump was going to sue Szabo for $100 million for wrongful filing of mechanic's liens. At trial, Trump admitted that both he and a senior executive at the company had used the name Barron as a pseudonym. "I believe I occasionally used that name," said Trump.


(also: this explains everything??
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP84B00049R001102790012-4.pdf
	"The KGB's Magical War for Peace"
	BY JOHN BARRON)


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-threatens-government-shutdown-in-the-fall/
	Trump threatens government shutdown in the fall

	President Trump on Tuesday advocated for a "shutdown" in the fall, suggesting that it could force a rules change in the Senate to kill the filibuster on legislation. 

		The reason for the plan negotiated between the Republicans and Democrats is that we need 60 votes in the Senate which are not there! We either elect more Republican Senators in 2018 or change the rules now to 51%. Our country needs a good "shutdown" in September to fix mess!

		— Donald J. Trump (@realDonaldTrump) May 2, 2017


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/21/us/politics/house-republicans-health-care-donald-trump.html
	Trump Warns House Republicans: Repeal Health Law or Lose Your Seats

	...The use of a political threat was a classic tactic for Mr. Trump, who keeps a running mental tally of his backers and detractors, and frequently boasts of his efforts to exact revenge from those who have crossed him.

	“We’re going to make sure to remember those who stood by us, and who stood by the word that they gave to their voters,” said Sean Spicer, the White House press secretary.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-obamacare-idUSKBN16R2P9
	Trump tries to rally support for healthcare bill

	...Republican Representative Walter Jones said Trump told lawmakers in the closed-door meeting at the Capitol that if the Republican bill does not pass, they would face "political problems." Jones said he thought Trump meant lawmakers could lose their seats.

	...While Trump predicted that Republicans could face challenges in primary contests ahead of the 2018 midterm elections if they do not gut Obamacare, there is also danger to them in doing so. If the Republican bill is passed, millions of voters might lose their healthcare coverage.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/01/03/us/politics/for-donald-trump-lessons-from-a-brothers-suffering.html
	Then came the unveiling of Fred Sr.’s will, which Donald had helped draft. It divided the bulk of the inheritance, at least $20 million, among his children and their descendants, “other than my son Fred C. Trump Jr.”

	Freddy’s children sued, claiming that an earlier version of the will had entitled them to their father’s share of the estate, but that Donald and his siblings had used “undue influence” over their grandfather, who had dementia, to cut them out.

	A week later, Mr. Trump retaliated by withdrawing the medical benefits critical to his nephew’s infant child.

	“I was angry because they sued,” he explained during last week’s interview.


http://www.newyorker.com/news/john-cassidy/what-sort-of-man-is-donald-trump
	Trump and his siblings insisted that the will accurately reflected their father’s wishes. After the challenge, it didn’t take them long to retaliate. On March 30th, Fred III received a certified letter telling him that the medical benefits provided to his family by the Trump organization would end on May 1st. The letter prompted Fred III to return to court, this time in Nassau County, where a judge ordered the Trumps to restore the health coverage until the dispute was resolved. “I will stick to my guns,” Fred III told Evans. “I just think it was wrong. These are not warm and fuzzy people. They never even came to see William in the hospital. Our family puts the ‘fun’ in dysfunctional.” Fred III’s sister, Mary, told Evans, “William is my father’s grandson. He is as much a part of that family as anybody else. He desperately needs extra care.”

	Trump, for his part, was unapologetic about his actions. “Why should we give him medical coverage?” he told Evans. When she asked him if he thought he might come across as cold-hearted, given the baby’s medical condition, he said, “I can’t help that. It’s cold when someone sues my father. Had he come to see me, things could very possibly have been much different for them.”


Trump might be more calculated with (at least some of) his public statements than people give him credit for. He certainly gives himself a lot of credit. Trump sees connections between his public statements and world events that others don't:


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	 TRUMP: No, because you're not going to do that. NATO is going to be just fine. But NATO countries -- we have 28 countries -- many of them are taking advantage of us because they're not paying. So we're protecting these countries and they're not paying.

	And when people leave that last part in, everybody agrees with me.

	I'm all in favor of NATO. I said NATO is obsolete. I was asked a question by one of your competitors and I said NATO is obsolete, because it's not taking care of terror. You understand that. And it turned out I was right. A lot of people gave me credit for that.

	Then, three months ago, on the front page of "The Wall Street Journal," they said NATO to develop a terror division. And somebody who's supposed to be very extraordinary was put in charge of it.

	That was all because of me. So I was right about that. 


In particular, Trump understands the idea of making deals and threats over the media:


https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/exqkbp/remembering-john-barron-donald-trumps-spokesman-alter-ego-116
	But to John Barron, a "Trump spokesperson," that wasn't the case: Selling the property was Trump's idea the whole time, Barron told reporters, making it seem like the real estate mogul had never even wanted the damn castle in the first place, and was happy to see it go: "It sure is easier to get a large commission on a $105-million sale than to put up a building," Barron told New York at the time. Contrary to the public's perception, Trump actually left the bruising battle victorious—at least according to Trump himself. 

	...Over the course of nearly a decade, Trump was quick to dispatch John Barron to share his position on deals with media outlets: "We have no interest whatsoever in Lincoln West," Barron told the New York Times, in response to questions about a Manhattan property in 1984. 

	...To this day, the roots of the name "John Barron" are hazy, at best. Strangely enough, Trump named his third son Barron in 2006, long after he retired the fictional Barron. D'Antonio suggested the name may be a reference to Barron Hilton, the famous hotelier who Trump bought out in Atlantic City ("John Baron," of course, announced that deal). 


http://www.nytimes.com/1985/04/02/sports/trump-asks-help-in-paying-flutie.html
	TRUMP ASKS HELP IN PAYING FLUTIE
	April 2, 1985

	 Donald Trump, the owner of the New Jersey Generals, has asked the other United States Football League owners to provide ''partial reimbursement'' for Doug Flutie's multimillion dollar contract, a spokesman for Trump said yesterday.

	John Barron, a vice president of the Trump Organization, said Trump wanted the other owners to honor an agreement that he said had been reached earlier this year before Trump signed Flutie to a six-year contract worth $8.25 million.

	''When a guy goes out and spends more money than a player is worth, he expects to get partial reimbursement from the other owners,'' Barron said of Trump's signing of Flutie.

	He added, though, that had the owners not agreed to provide partial reimbursement, Trump ''probably would have'' signed Flutie anyway.''

	Trump, contacted last night, said: ''People wanted me to get him for the good of the league. I told them I would sign him, but at some point I wanted partial reimbursement for the cost.

	''From the standpoint of one team, it didn't make any economic sense to sign him. So I told them at some point I would ask for reimbursement.''

	He said he didn't have any specific figure in mind. ''I would want some percentage.'' 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	QUESTION: (inaudible) will you defend the Baltic states if they're invaded by Russia? According to...

	TRUMP: I'll tell you what. Let me say it once again. Let me say it once again. OK? Many countries, including the NATO countries, some of which I think you have five that are current that have paid what they owe. And they can afford to pay this. It's not like they can't afford it.

	They just see us as a soft touch. You know, in business we say somebody's a soft touch. I don't know if I've been called a soft touch, but maybe I have sometimes. But in business, they call them a soft touch. They haven't paid us. OK? I want them to pay.

	Excuse me. I'm not saying anything. I don't talk. I'm not like Obama where he tells you everything he's going to do -- we're going to go and do this; we're going to go and do that. I don't talk. But they're going to pay.

	No, no -- yeah, it sends a signal. You know what signal it says? It says we're going to pay.

	You know, somebody said, "but we have treaties." I said that's right. And in the treaties, they're supposed to pay. They're going to pay. And they will pay. They will pay.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/863007411132649473
	James Comey better hope that there are no "tapes" of our conversations before he starts leaking to the press!
	5:26 AM - 12 May 2017 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2016/07/27/donald-trumps-falsehood-laden-press-conference-annotated/
	QUESTION: (inaudible) Putin (ph) say stay out? Why not say that?

	TRUMP: Why do I have to (ph) get involved with Putin? I have nothing to do with Putin. I've never spoken to him. I don't know anything about him other than he will respect me. He doesn't respect our president. And if it is Russia -- which it's probably not, nobody knows who it is -- but if it is Russia, it's really bad for a different reason, because it shows how little respect they have for our country, when they would hack into a major party and get everything. But it would be interesting to see -- I will tell you this -- Russia, if you're listening, I hope you're able to find the 30,000 e-mails that are missing. I think you will probably be rewarded mightily by our press. Let's see if that happens. That'll be next. Yes, sir...


Another thing that's important to understand is that it looks like there might be something very fishy in Donald Trump's tax returns:


https://apnews.com/38bd4abbb6d54133ac865c45a74acb43/secret-police-file-trump-sure-presidential-win-1996
	Secret police file: Trump sure of presidential win _ in 1996
	Jan. 12, 2017

	PRAGUE (AP) — Nearly 30 years ago, Donald Trump was confident he would win the U.S. presidential election — as an independent in 1996, according to recently uncovered files from Czechoslovakia’s Communist-era secret police.

	Czechoslovakia was the home nation of Trump’s first wife, Ivana, a model, athlete and businesswoman who became the mother of his three oldest children: Donald Jr., Ivanka and Eric.

	A year before the 1989 collapse of communism in many parts of Europe, details about Ivana Trump’s 1988 visit back to her homeland were recorded in a classified police report. The Oct. 22, 1988 report claimed that Trump refused to run for president in 1988 — despite alleged pressure to do so — because he felt, at 42, he was too young. But the secret report said he intended to run in the 1996 U.S. presidential race as an independent, when he would be 50.

	“Even though it looks like a utopia, D. TRUMP is confident he will succeed,” the police report said, based on information from an unspecified source who talked to Ivana Trump’s father, Milos Zelnicek, about her visit.

	It was unclear where the alleged “pressure” was coming from.

	The report is interesting because, in the United States, there was little public knowledge that Trump would consider a presidential run until a 1988 interview on “The Oprah Winfrey Show.”

	“I would never want to rule it out totally,” he said then.

	...Trump’s first wife was born Ivana Zelnickova in 1949 in the Czechoslovak city of Gottwaldov, the former city of Zlin that just had been renamed by the Communists, who took over the country in 1948. She married Trump, her second husband, in 1977. As she kept traveling home across the Iron Curtain on a regular basis, Ivana became a tempting target for the powerful, deeply feared Czechoslovak secret police agency known as the StB.

	...Svoboda said there’s no indication of a secret police file on Donald Trump. He didn’t travel to Czechoslovakia under communism, unlike his children, who used to spend summer vacations there.

	Due to such attention, the secret police reports contain detailed information about Ivana Trump’s trips to Czechoslovakia, including dates, telephone numbers she called, people she met, what they discussed and other details about her life with her husband. One of the reports claims the couple had a wedding deal in which Trump allegedly stated he wanted to have at least three children with her.

	The Associated Press visited the archive in Prague and obtained copies of all available documents about Ivana Trump. Some of the content has also been reported by Czech media and Germany’s Bild newspaper.

	The 1988 secret police report in particular suggested that Ivana Trump was nervous, “which is not common for her” after her father picked her up at Prague’s international airport after traveling in from Paris, where she visited a fashion house. Trump did not join her on this trip.

	Only after she and her father arrived in her hometown did Ivana Trump reveal that the U.S. ambassador to Prague at the time, Julian Martin Niemczyk, twice invited her to visit the embassy, which she declined to accept, according to a police source that met with her father on Oct. 11, 1988. Ivana Trump allegedly said she believed U.S. embassy staffers were following her. The fact that she was supposed to meet with a Czechoslovak security official during the trip added to her nervousness, the police file stated.

	She didn’t give any details about that meeting, the report said. But it added that she said “as a wife of D. TRUMP she receives constant attention because he is pressured to run for the office of U.S. president ... and any mistake she would make could have immense consequences for him.”

	Born in 1946, Trump planned to make history in 1996 as an independent candidate despite the fact that both the Democrats and the Republicans were allegedly wooing him to join them, the report said. A note at the end suggested that Ivana Trump’s trips home could be possibly used to reveal agents among the U.S. embassy’s staffers.

	...After Trump’s presidential win in November, Ivana Trump expressed interest in becoming the new U.S. ambassador to Prague — a possibility heartily welcomed by Czech President Milos Zeman.


http://www.businessinsider.com/czech-secret-agents-spied-on-donald-trump-he-is-tax-exempt-for-30-years-2016-12
	In June 1977, an informant with the cover name “Lubos” reported that Ivana had married a man in Austria in 1968 and had worked there at a petrol station. After that, the informant claimed, she emigrated to Canada and married the American Donald Trump.

	The spy writes that Trump’s company is absolutely safe, economically speaking, since it receives commissions from the state. One other juicy detail: “Another advantage is the personal relationship with the American President and the fact that he is completely tax-exempt for the next 30 years.” 


http://chipjacobs.com/articles/business-defence/the-full-employment-act-for-spies/
	The Full-Employment Act For Spies

	July 9, 1990

	...The same global changes that have accelerated prospects for world peace have spurred espionage opportunities between former adversaries.

	“The biggest problem is all the openness that comes from peace breaking out,” the FBI’s Lawler said. “One might say `We are all friends and don’t worry about spying,’ when in fact additional information allows them to spy even more. Added to that are the defense layoffs here. The Soviets could try to get to a disgruntled employee or somebody that needs money. 

	...“In Southern California, we have seen the Soviets use three espionage methods,” explained the FBI’s Lawler. “They collect information from trade shows and conventions and peruse annual reports and brochures. Sometimes they’ll wait for a greedy American to contact them, like the did with Boyce and Bell, or they’ll study organization charts and look for people with weakenesses or financial troubles. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1992/11/29/trump-went-broke-but-stayed-on-top/e1685555-1de7-400c-99a8-9cd9c0bca9fe/
	TRUMP WENT BROKE, BUT STAYED ON TOP 

	November 29, 1992

	One day in 1990, as Donald Trump tells it, he and model Marla Maples were strolling along New York's Fifth Avenue when they passed a beggar.

	"You see that man? Right now he's worth $900 million more than me. ... Right now I'm worth minus $900 million," Trump told Maples.

	After a decade of profligate borrowing, Trump lacked the cash to make his loan payments. Although he owned hotels, skyscrapers, casinos and an airline, his debts exceeded the value of his properties by hundreds of millions of dollars.

	Trump's lenders could have forced him into personal bankruptcy and stripped him of almost everything. But that didn't happen.

	Instead, the bankers and investors to whom Trump owed money made a series of deals that left him wealthy. They let him keep some properties and took control of others, and they reduced Trump's personal debt by about $750 million, more than four-fifths of the total.

	They didn't do it out of charity. Rather, the lenders were reluctant to confront Trump in bankruptcy court, where they would face years of delay and massive legal expenses. In the end, lenders said, they feared they would recover less money in bankruptcy than they could get by striking compromises with Trump.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/beltway/2016/11/01/the-art-of-the-dodge-trumps-916-million-of-net-operating-losses/
	Today, The New York Times dissected the $916 million of Net Operating Losses (NOLs) that Donald Trump claimed on his 1995 tax return, which The Times disclosed last month.  Basically, Trump borrowed, and lost, a large amount of money in a series of failed ventures, mainly casinos. While the losses were mostly borne by his creditors, Trump took tax deductions for large amounts of interest, depreciation, and operating expenses.  As a result, he was potentially able to avoid paying federal income taxes for nearly two decades.

	We have no evidence that Trump broke any laws but, at a minimum, he seems to have aggressively stretched the law to avoid reporting taxable income of hundreds of millions of dollars from restructured loans.

	...In the early 1990s, Trump was in deep financial trouble and pressed his lenders to restructure his debt. But, based on documents filed in bankruptcy court, Trump did not report the income from restructuring his large public borrowings. He excluded the income despite reservations expressed by his own lawyers.  We do not know whether the IRS ever challenged his position.


http://www.oregonlive.com/today/index.ssf/2017/05/donald_trump_closely_tied_to_r.html
	Henry says that because of Trump's 1990s bankruptcies, which were mostly related to his involvement in the casino business, "none of the major New York banks would lend to him. Trump was pretty much unfinance-able."


http://www.nytimes.com/1995/10/25/nyregion/crowning-the-comeback-king.html
	Crowning the Comeback King

	October 25, 1995

 	Though there are still four years to go in the 90's, business and government leaders in New York honored Donald J. Trump yesterday for pulling off what they called "the comeback of the decade." 

 	Mr. Trump, the developer who came to epitomize opulent wealth during the 80's before tumbling into deep financial trouble, has managed to erase much of his debt and is moving ahead with major projects at a time other developers are idling. 

	... After the collapse of the real estate market of the 1980's, Mr. Trump's company was left holding some $8.8 billion in debt, causing his personal net worth to drop to a low of about $1 billion in the red by 1991.

	But since then, his fortunes have changed. He continues to pursue the trademark trophy-style projects he is known for, such as a hotel and condominium project on the southwest corner of Central Park that is expected to open by late 1996. 


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/week-transcript-donald-trump-vice-president-joe-biden/story?id=41020870
	 STEPHANOPOULOS: You said that...

	TRUMP: And we'll do better and yet we'll have a better relationship with Russia.

	And having a good relationship -- maybe. and having a good relationship with Russia is a good thing, not a bad thing.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: You said you have no investments in Russia.

	But do you owe any money to Russian individuals and institutions?

	TRUMP: No. Not.

	STEPHANOPOULOS: No?

	TRUMP: The primary thing I did what Russia -- I bought a house in Palm Beach at a bankruptcy. It was a bankrupt, you know, person. I bought it from the banks. I bought it for about $40 million. I sold it for $100 million to a Russian.
	
	That was probably five years ago. And that was primarily it.
	
	STEPHANOPOULOS: You partner now with...
	
	TRUMP: Now, well I sell...
	
	STEPHANOPOULOS: (INAUDIBLE) Grand...
	
	TRUMP: Will I sell -- many years ago. I don't think they're Russian. I think there were other people, but there were various partners.
	
	Will I sell condos to Russians on occasion?
	
	Probably.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Peter Kiritchenko

	Kiritchenko, a Ukrainian businessman who owned two condominiums with his daughter at Trump International Beach Resort in Sunny Isles Beach, Fla., was named in a money-laundering scheme involving former Ukraine prime minister Pavlo Lazarenko.

	According to federal prosecutors in San Francisco in 2009, Kiritchenko helped Lazarenko launder millions of dollars obtained through extortion by purchasing luxury real estate in the United States and other countries.


http://www.nytimes.com/1998/06/29/nyregion/businessman-of-mystery-arts-patron-dogged-by-fbi-claim-of-russian-mob-ties.html
	Businessman of Mystery; Arts Patron Dogged by F.B.I. Claim of Russian Mob Ties

	...In an affidavit in support of a wiretap application in the Ivankov investigation in 1995, Lester R. McNulty, an F.B.I. agent in a squad formed to combat Russian organized crime, quoted German law enforcement officials and unnamed informers as stating that Mr. Komarov was laundering money for Mr. Ivankov and that Mr. Ivankov and two associates owned three-quarters of the Moscow Rolls-Royce dealership as a front to launder criminal proceeds.

	...After two visits to scout business opportunities in New York and Los Angeles in 1990, he said, he came for good in 1992, leaving his wife and their grown son, Roman, in Moscow. With a nest egg of $300,000 and a $150,000 advance payment against future clothing shipments to trading partners in Russia, he said, he bought a $400,000 co-op apartment on the 31st floor of the Trump Plaza on Third Avenue and 61st Street, and later bought a $450,000 apartment in Miami.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	...Viktor Khrapunov

	Khrapunov, a former Kazakhstan energy minister and mayor of Almaty, owns three units in the Trump SoHo through shell companies, according to lawyers for the Kazakh city who filed a 2014 federal lawsuit against him in Los Angeles. Almaty's lawyers alleged in the lawsuit that Khrapunov used real estate in California, New York, Europe and the Middle East to hide hundreds of millions of dollars looted by selling state-owned assets.


http://www.oregonlive.com/today/index.ssf/2013/04/feds_russian_mob_ran_celebrity.html
	Feds: Russian mob ran celebrity poker games; Trump Tower apartment raided, 34 charged

	...The money-laundering investigation led to arrests Tuesday in New York, Los Angeles, Miami and elsewhere around the country. There also were FBI raids at a $6 million apartment in Trump Tower on Fifth Avenue and a prestigious Madison Avenue art gallery owned by two of the defendants.

	...Prosecutors alleged proceeds were laundered through shell companies in Cyprus and in the United States by a criminal enterprise with strong ties to Russia and Ukraine.

	Assistant U.S. Attorney Harris Fischman told a U.S. magistrate judge in Manhattan that Vadim Trincher, 52, directed much of the international racketeering enterprise from his $5 million apartment at Trump Tower.

	"From his apartment he oversaw what must have been the world's largest sports book," Fischman said in a successful argument to have Trincher held for trial without bail. "He catered to millionaires and billionaires."

	Trincher's apartment is located directly below one owned by Donald Trump, authorities said.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	...Anatoly Golubchik, Vadim Trincher and Michael Sall

	Three Trump condo owners — Golubchik,  Trincher and Sall — were convicted in 2013 in federal court in New York of participating in an illegal high-stakes sports betting ring for a Russian-American organized crime group. The betting ring operated illegal gambling websites and catered almost exclusively to wealthy oligarchs from the former Soviet Union, according to prosecutors.

	Golubchik and Sall own Trump condos in Sunny Isles Beach. And professional poker player Trincher owns a condo in Trump Tower in New York City.

	Golubchik and Trincher were principal leaders of the enterprise, which included money laundering and extortion, prosecutors charged in the indictment.

	The godfather of the operation was identified as Alimzhan Tokhtakhounov, who federal prosecutors said was a Vor, “a powerful figure in former Soviet Union organized crime” who never left Russia because he was under indictment in the U.S. for his role in allegedly bribing officials at the 2002 Winter Olympics in Salt Lake City.

	Sall helped launder tens of millions of dollars from the gambling enterprise, prosecutors said when they announced that all three condo owners pleaded guilty to lesser charges. Sall pleaded guilty to interstate travel in aid of an unlawful activity — illegal gambling.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/22/politics/trump-taj-mahal/index.html
	Trump's Taj Mahal casino broke anti-money laundering rules in the 1990s

	It was the preferred spot for Russian mobsters to gamble

	...The Trump Taj Mahal casino broke anti-money laundering rules 106 times in its first year and a half of operation in the early 1990s, according to the IRS in a 1998 settlement agreement.

	It's a bit of forgotten history that's buried in federal records held by an investigative unit of the Treasury Department, records that congressional committees investigating Trump's ties to Russia have obtained access to, CNN has learned.

	The casino repeatedly failed to properly report gamblers who cashed out $10,000 or more in a single day, the government said. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Money laundering was an issue for Trump's Taj Mahal Casino in Atlantic City, which was fined $10 million in 2015 for failing to report suspicious transactions. Federal rules are designed to protect the U.S. financial system from being used as a safe haven for dirty money and transnational crimes, Jennifer Shasky Calvery, then-director of the U.S. Treasury's Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCen), said at the time. It was the largest penalty the agency ever levied against a casino since reporting requirements began in 2003, according to The Wall Street Journal.

	"The Trump Organization admitted that it failed to implement and maintain an effective (anti-money laundering) program; failed to report suspicious transactions; failed to properly file required currency transaction reports; and failed to keep appropriate records as required by (the Bank Secrecy Act)," FinCen said in a statement.


http://money.howstuffworks.com/money-laundering2.htm
	How Money Laundering Works 

	Investing in legitimate businesses Launderers sometimes place dirty money in otherwise legitimate businesses to clean it. They may use large businesses like brokerage firms or casinos that deal in so much money it's easy for the dirty stuff to blend in

	...The variety of tools available to launderers makes this a difficult crime to stop, but authorities do catch the bad guys every now and then. 


https://taxcontroversy.foxrothschild.com/2017/02/crackdown-money-laundering-luxury-real-estate-sector-extended-another-six-months/
	The U.S. Treasury Department’s Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN) announced today that its aggressive efforts to combat money laundering in the luxury real estate market have been extended for an additional six months. Confirming his agency’s concerns about illicit funds flowing through the U.S. real estate industry, FinCEN Acting Director Jamal El-Hindi said today that this initiative is “producing valuable data that is assisting law enforcement and is serving to inform our future efforts to address money laundering in the real estate sector.” Today’s announcement means that temporary measures requiring U.S. title insurance companies to identify the natural persons behind shell companies used to pay all-cash to high-end residential real estate in six major metropolitan areas – known as “Geographic Targeting Orders” (GTOs) –remain in place for six more months.


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/05/10/russia-probe-senate-requests-documents-from-money-laundering-watchdog-agency.html
	Russia probe: Senate requests Trump documents from agency that monitors money laundering

	- The Senate Intelligence Committee has requested information about President Donald Trump and his top aides from a financial intelligence unit in the Treasury Department.

	- The agency, known as FinCEN, imposed a $10 million civil penalty on Trump Taj Mahal in 2015 for multiple violations of money-laundering laws.

	Wednesday, 10 May 2017 | 12:29 PM ET


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...the Justice Department inquiry led by Mueller now has added flavors. The Post noted that the investigation also includes "suspicious financial activity" involving "Russian operatives." The New York Times was more specific in its account, saying that Mueller is looking at whether Trump associates laundered financial payoffs from Russian officials by channeling them through offshore accounts.

	Trump has repeatedly labeled Comey's and Mueller's investigations "witch hunts," and his lawyers have said that the last decade of his tax returns (which the president has declined to release) would show that he had no income or loans from Russian sources. In May, Trump told NBC that he has no property or investments in Russia. "I am not involved in Russia," he said.

	But that doesn't address national security and other problems that might arise for the president if Russia is involved in Trump, either through potentially compromising U.S. business relationships or through funds that flowed into his wallet years ago. In that context, a troubling history of Trump's dealings with Russians exists outside of Russia: in a dormant real-estate development firm, the Bayrock Group, which once operated just two floors beneath the president's own office in Trump Tower.

	Bayrock partnered with the future president and his two eldest children, Donald Jr. and Ivanka, on a series of real-estate deals between 2002 and about 2011, the most prominent being the troubled Trump Soho hotel and condominium in Manhattan.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	Felix Sater

	Sater spent a year in prison for stabbing a man in the face with a broken margarita glass at the Rio Grande restaurant and bar in New York in 1991.

	A federal criminal complaint in New York in 1998 accused Sater of money laundering and stock manipulation but was kept secret by prosecutors because the Russian immigrant was working as a CIA informant, according to numerous published reports.

	...Kriss, a former finance director for the developers, accused Sater, Lauria and Bayrock partners in a 2010 federal lawsuit of diverting millions of dollars to shell companies to avoid U.S. taxes. He also claimed they kept secret Sater's criminal past and his guilty plea to racketeering charges while “he was aiding the prosecution of his Mafia and Russian organized crime confederates.”

	...Sater's criminal past came to light in 2007. That year, Trump testified in a deposition in a defamation lawsuit that he didn't think Sater was a principal at Bayrock and that he was considering not doing business with him anymore. But Sater subsequently traveled to Russia carrying business cards identifying him as a senior adviser to Trump with a Trump Organization phone number and email address, according to photos of the card posted online by NBC, the BBC and other news organizations. In 2013, Trump said in another deposition that he didn't think Sater was connected to the Mafia, that Sater mostly dealt "with my company, not me" and that "if he was sitting in the room right now I really wouldn't know what he looked like."

	Sater told The Washington Post last year that he met one-on-one numerous times with Trump. He met alongside Donald Trump Jr. in Phoenix with local officials, and in New York he met repeatedly with Trump and his staff to talk about potential deals in Los Angeles, Ukraine and China, the Post reported.

	Trump's lawyer, in interviews with The New York Times and the Post, downplayed the relationship between the two men, saying Trump met and spoke with lots of people but his relationship was with Bayrock, not Sater. 

	...Alexander Mashkevich

	Mashkevich, a Kazakh mining billionaire, was another source of funds for the SoHo project, according Kriss’ lawsuit. Bayrock's investment pamphlet describes him in general as a source of Bayrock financing.

	Investigators in Belgium accused Mashkevich and two of his Kazakh business partners of money laundering and forgery connected to the $55 million in alleged bribes they received from a Belgian company in the mid-1990s, according to the Financial Times.

	Mashkevich and principal Bayrock partner Tevfik Arif were embroiled in a case in 2010, when Turkish police alleged prostitution and human trafficking after they raided a luxury yacht that Mashkevich chartered. After police boarded the Savarona — once owned by the founder of the modern Turkish state, Mustafa Kemal Atatürk — they arrested 10 wealthy men, including Arif, a former Kazakh official. They also found nine young women from Russia and Ukraine — two were 16 years old — and “a huge amount of contraceptives,” according to the Israeli newspaper Yedioth Ahronoth.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...Trump testified under oath in a 2007 deposition that Bayrock brought Russian investors to his Trump Tower office to discuss deals in Moscow, and said he was pondering investing there.

	"It's ridiculous that I wouldn't be investing in Russia," Trump said in that deposition. "Russia is one of the hottest places in the world for investment.

	One of Bayrock's principals was a career criminal named Felix Sater who had ties to Russian and American organized crime groups. Before linking up with the company and with Trump, he had worked as a mob informant for the U.S. government, fled to Moscow to avoid criminal charges while boasting of his KGB and Kremlin contacts there, and had gone to prison for slashing apart another man’s face with a broken cocktail glass.

	In a series of interviews and a lawsuit, a former Bayrock insider, Jody Kriss, claims that he eventually departed from the firm because he became convinced that Bayrock was actually a front for money laundering.

	...But Kriss's assertion that Bayrock was a criminal operation during the years it partnered with Trump has been deemed plausible enough to earn him a court victory: In December, a federal judge in New York said Kriss's lawsuit against Bayrock, which he first filed nine years ago, could proceed as a racketeering case.

	...When Sater emerged from prison 15 months later, he found his way back into trouble. With a group that included Lauria (who admits to having had ties to organized crime figures and grew up in New York as a close friend of a prominent Mafia boss), Sater opened an investment firm on the penthouse floor of 40 Wall Street


http://www.nytimes.com/1995/12/07/business/40-wall-street-is-sold-to-trump.html
	40 Wall Street Is Sold to Trump
	Published: December 7, 1995

	 The real estate developer Donald J. Trump completed his purchase of 40 Wall Street yesterday, buying the distinguished 70-story office building, across the street from the New York Stock Exchange, for a price estimated at less than $8 million.

	Mr. Trump in July had disclosed an agreement to buy the building, which contains 1.1 million square feet of space, from Kinson Properties of Hong Kong. Kinson paid $8 million for it in 1993.

	While representatives of Mr. Trump declined to disclose the price he had paid, published reports said it was less than $8 million.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	From there, according to federal prosecutors, Sater and his team set about laundering money for the mob and fleecing about $40 million from unwitting and largely elderly investors, a number of whom were Holocaust survivors.

	By the time law enforcement authorities eventually caught on to the 40 Wall Street operation, Sater had fled to Russia. Lauria visited him there.

	Sater "was always hustling and scheming, and his contacts in Russia were the same kind of contacts he had in the United States," Lauria wrote in a 2003 memoir, "The Scorpion and the Frog." "The difference was that in Russia his crooked contacts were links between Russian organized crime, the Russian military, the KGB, and operatives who played both ways, or sometimes three ways."


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russian_mafia#1992.E2.80.932000:_Growth_and_internationalization
	Russian mafia

	...1992–2000: Growth and internationalization

	When the USSR collapsed and a free market economy emerged, organized criminal groups began to take over Russia's economy, with many ex-KGB soldiers and veterans of the Afghan war offering their skills to the crime bosses.


http://articles.latimes.com/1988-02-16/news/mn-42975_1_russian-mafia
	'Russian Mafia' : KGB Steers Criminals to U.S. Careers
	February 16, 1988

	WASHINGTON — During his years of imprisonment, Soviet dissident Anatoly Sharansky chanced to meet a Russian criminal, a professional con artist who was pursuing a bizarre goal: Despite the rigors of prison life, he was diligently studying English in hopes of emigrating to America--to ply his trade as a swindler.

	America, he declared, was a land of easy pickings. Three of his friends were already there.

	"But how will you get there?" asked the astonished Sharansky, who knew first-hand how hard it is for Russians to get permission to leave their homeland. "You aren't Jewish."

	"The KGB will help me," the confident swindler replied. The Soviet secret police had helped his friends get to the United States by obtaining exit visas to Israel, he said, and he expected the same.

	Practical Reasons

	Sharansky's encounter, described in a recent interview, reflects growing evidence that the KGB has systematically helped criminals leave the Soviet Union. And U.S. officials say the Kremlin appears to have, from its point of view, two eminently practical reasons for doing so:

	--First, to be rid of the criminals--much as President Fidel Castro did when he opened Cuban jails during the Mariel boatlift a decade ago.

	--Second, to create a network in the West for their agents.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	...About a year after the terrorist attacks of Sept. 11, 2001, Sater joined Bayrock, a company that marketed itself as a property developer and had opened Manhattan offices on the 24th floor of a well-known building at 725 Fifth Avenue: Trump Tower.

	In late 2002, Sater phoned Kriss and invited him to consult at Bayrock, bragging about a deep-pocketed investor, Tevfik Arif, who was partnering with him in search of bigger deals.

	Arif, born in Kazakhstan, was a former Soviet official who had relocated to Turkey to make his fortune. He ran several upscale, seaside hotels there that catered almost exclusively to Russians, according to Kriss, and he had also redeveloped a shopping center in Brooklyn. 

	...Bayrock was initially funded, in part, with a $10 million investment transferred to the firm by Arif's brother in Russia, who, according to Kriss's lawsuit, was able to tap into the cash reserves of a Kazakh chromium refinery. 

	...Bayrock never seemed to be short of money, however. According to Kriss’s lawsuit, the team running the little development firm in Trump Tower could locate funds "month after month, for two years, in fact more frequently, whenever Bayrock ran out of cash." If times got tight, Bayrock's owners would "magically show up with a wire from 'somewhere' just large enough to keep the company going."

	...It was Sater who initially developed the relationship with Trump, according to Kriss and court records from Trump's lawsuit against me. Sater had made the acquaintance of three Trump Organization executives who then introduced him to their boss. When the Bayrock team met Trump in 2002, the future president was enduring a long stretch in the financial wilderness, having narrowly escaped personal bankruptcy in the early 1990s.

	He eventually emerged from that mess as a pariah among big banks. He was also a determined survivor and tireless self-promoter and he parlayed those skills into recreating himself as a branding machine and golf course developer in the late 1990s and early 2000s.

	Kriss says that it was Arif and Sater who pitched the future president on the idea of launching an international chain of Trump-branded, mixed-use hotels and condominiums. And Bayrock got to Trump at a time when his “brand” could help get a little extra attention for a condo project, but didn’t amount to much more than that.

	“Trump was trying to build his brand and Bayrock was trying to market it,” Kriss recalls. “It wasn’t clear who needed each other more. This was before the show, remember.”

	The “show,” of course, was “The Apprentice.” It aired for the first time on Jan. 8, 2004, and became a sensation that vaulted Trump into reality TV stardom. In the real world, Trump's casinos were faltering. But on reality TV, Trump posed as a successful leader and dealmaker who embodied a certain kind of entrepreneurial flair and over-the-top billionairedom — an impression that stuck with tens of millions of TV viewers.

	The popularity of "The Apprentice" also gave the Bayrock-Trump partnership added zing.

	“That put Bayrock in a great position once the show debuted,” Kriss says. “The show did it for Trump, man. Nobody was interested in licensing his name before that.”

	The hook at Bayrock, for Trump, was an 18 percent equity stake in what became the Trump Soho hotel, a steady stream of management fees on all Bayrock projects and the ability to plaster his name on properties without having to invest a single dollar of his own.

	It’s not clear how carefully Trump vetted his Bayrock partners. But his lack of concern about their backgrounds — and the potential risk to his own reputation from dealing with them — was part of a pattern. In Atlantic City, he had partnered with men with organized crime ties. Later, he and his children struck deals in Brazil and Azerbaijan with partners who had murky backgrounds or unusual legal entanglements.


https://www.msn.com/en-us/money/markets/trump-dealt-with-a-series-of-people-who-had-mob-ties/ar-AAinc5y
	In 1981, a young and ambitious Donald Trump sat down with federal agents and discussed his calculation in entering the mob-infested world of Atlantic City casinos.

	He acknowledged it might tarnish the reputation his family built through traditional real-estate development in New York. He was aware a business partner in the New Jersey beach town knew people who might be unsavory. A Federal Bureau of Investigation agent advised Mr. Trump there were easier ways he could invest, said an FBI memo recounting the discussion.


https://www.bloomberg.com/view/articles/2017-06-21/trump-russia-and-those-shadowy-sater-deals-at-bayrock
	Given Arif's halting English, it was Sater and Kriss who interacted most frequently with the Trump family—and Sater the most often with Trump himself. Kriss says that most of his own contacts were with the elder Trump children, Don Jr. and Ivanka, and included drafting contracts and occasional nights on the town.

	While Trump’s kids were involved in the back-and-forth with Bayrock, it was Trump himself who always had the final say.

	“Donald was always in charge,” says Kriss. “Donald had to agree to every term of every deal and had to sign off on everything. Nothing happened unless he said it was okay to do it. Even if Donald Jr., shook your hand on a deal, he came back downstairs to renegotiate if his father told him to.”

	The Trumps, Kriss says, saw Sater "frequently" and valued the relationship because “Felix demonstrated that he was loyal to them.” He says that at one point Sater was meeting with the future president in his Trump Tower office multiple times a week. Sater, according to a later court deposition, said that his business conversations with Trump in that office were wide-ranging and frequent — “on a constant basis."

	...The third and final major project Bayrock and Trump worked on together was their most high-profile effort, the 46-story Trump Soho hotel in lower Manhattan.

	Trump, Sater and Arif were all photographed together at a splashy launch party for the Trump Soho in 2007. Trump also pitched the Trump Soho on an episode of "The Apprentice," promising that "this brilliant, $370 million work of art will be an awe-inspiring masterpiece."

	"Have you previously associated with people you knew were members of organized crime?" one of my lawyers asked.

	"No, I haven't," Trump responded. "And it's hard to overly blame Bayrock. Things like that can happen. But I want to see what action Bayrock takes before I make a decision."

	..."I don't know him very well," Trump added, saying that he hadn't conversed very often with Sater. "If he were sitting in the room right now I really wouldn't know what he looked like."

	Trump also said that he didn't think that questions about Sater’s background meant that he should have ended his business partnership with him: “Somebody said that he is in the Mafia. What am I going to do?”


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/03/28/trump-business-past-ties-russian-mobsters-organized-crime/98321252/
	To expand his real estate developments over the years, Donald Trump, his company and partners repeatedly turned to wealthy Russians and oligarchs from former Soviet republics — several allegedly connected to organized crime, according to a USA TODAY review of court cases, government and legal documents and an interview with a former federal prosecutor.

	...Trump told reporters in February: "I have no dealings with Russia. I have no deals that could happen in Russia, because we’ve stayed away. And I have no loans with Russia. I have no loans with Russia at all."

	Yet in 2013, after Trump addressed potential investors in Moscow, he bragged to Real Estate Weekly about his access to Russia's rich and powerful. “I have a great relationship with many Russians, and almost all of the oligarchs were in the room,” Trump said, referring to Russians who made fortunes when former Soviet state enterprises were sold to private investors.

	...However, the deals, and the large number of Russians who have bought condos in Trump buildings, raise questions about the secrecy he has maintained around his real estate empire. Trump is the first president in 40 years to refuse to turn over his tax returns, which could shed light on his business dealings.


http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trump-lawyers-detail-immaterial-earnings-russian-sources/story?id=47372423
	President Trump’s tax returns for the past decade show little income from Russian sources and no debt owed to Russian lenders, his lawyers said. 

	 ..."Over the years, it is likely that [The Trump Organization] or third-party entities engaged in ordinary course sales of goods or services to Russians or Russian entities, such as sales / rentals / fees for condominiums, hotel rooms, rounds of golf, books or Trump-licensed products (e.g., ties, mattresses, wines, etc.) that could have produced income attributable to Russian sources,” according to the letter.

	"The amounts are immaterial," it added. 


Perhaps, the dealmaker Mr. Trump ran into financial trouble, but some friends in Russia's intelligence services found a "mutually beneficial" way to help him out. But indications of such a deal could appear in Donald Trump's tax returns. According to their records, the Soviets at least were interested in Mr. Trump and his tax returns (as well as being interested that Trump was being "pressured" to run for President in 1988).

But this is a problem, since if Trump's tax returns showed illicit activity, and someone else had their hands on them, he could be blackmailed with his tax returns.

It does look like someone else has a copy of Donald Trump's tax returns:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/10/03/insider/the-time-i-found-donald-trumps-tax-records-in-my-mailbox.html
	The Time I Found Donald Trump’s Tax Records in My Mailbox

	By SUSANNE CRAIG OCT. 2, 2016 

	My colleagues make fun of my old-fashioned devotion to my mailbox.

	It’s about 30 feet from my desk — among all the other third-floor employees’ mailboxes — and I check it constantly, always hoping a tipster will have sent me some revealing letter or secret document.

	In Metro, we get a lot of junk mail and are regularly flooded with correspondence from prisoners in New York’s penitentiaries.

	But Friday, Sept. 23, was different.

	I walked to my mailbox and spotted a manila envelope, postmarked New York, NY, with a return address of The Trump Organization. My heart skipped a beat.
Continue reading the main story

	I have been on the hunt for Donald J. Trump’s tax returns. Mr. Trump, the Republican presidential nominee, has broken with decades-long tradition and refused to make his returns public. I have written extensively about his finances, but like almost every other reporter, I was eager to see his actual returns.

	The envelope looked legitimate. I opened it, anxiously, and was astonished.

	Inside were what appeared to be pages from Mr. Trump’s 1995 tax records, containing detailed figures that revealed his tax strategies. Almost immediately, I walked over to the desk of David Barstow — a three-time Pulitzer Prize-winning investigative reporter and my teammate in the quest for Mr. Trump’s tax returns.

	...People were fascinated not only by the story, but also with how we had gotten it. Why did the tipster send the documents to me, of all the reporters out there? Probably because I wrote an exhaustive examination of Mr. Trump’s $650 million of debt in August that drew millions of readers.

	The whole experience has left me eager to share a bit of advice with my fellow reporters: Check your mailboxes. Especially nowadays, when people are worried that anything sent by email will leave forensic fingerprints, “snail mail” is a great way to communicate with us anonymously.


We can only guess who:


http://www.mediaite.com/online/roger-stone-thinks-there-might-be-a-snitch-in-the-trump-campaign/
	Roger Stone Thinks There Might Be a Snitch in the Trump Campaign
	October 4th, 2016

	Trump ally Roger Stone suspects that the candidate’s campaign is out of joint, and someone in the tent might be responsible for leaking Trump’s 1995 tax returns.

	Speaking Tuesday on Boston Herald Radio, Stone, the former Trump campaign advisor, explained his theories about the provenance of the leaked returns, which ended up in mailboxes belonging to reporters at the New York Times and New York Daily News.

	Stone said the leak might have come from “Somebody who worked at The Trump Organization, perhaps. Or perhaps a former employee. But I would just be speculating.”


http://nypost.com/1999/11/10/trump-bares-naked-ambition-prez-hopeful-stuns-reform-party-with-raunchy-stern-talk/
	TRUMP BARES NAKED AMBITION – PREZ HOPEFUL STUNS REFORM PARTY WITH RAUNCHY STERN TALK
	November 10, 1999 

	...Trump’s political adviser, Roger Stone, said it’s unlikely Trump would release his tax returns – as many presidential candidates do in the spirit of full disclosure – to verify Trump’s worth.


http://www.mediaite.com/online/roger-stone-thinks-there-might-be-a-snitch-in-the-trump-campaign/
	It should be noted that Stone is an enthusiastic advocate of exposing stolen documents when they come from the other side. He trumpeted the much hyped Wikileaks revelations


https://twitter.com/wikileaks/status/823212055322853382
	Trump Counselor Kellyanne Conway stated today that Trump will not release his tax returns. Send them to: https://wikileaks.org/#submit  so we can.
	8:53 AM - 22 Jan 2017 


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/10/politics/roger-stone-wikileaks-russia/index.html
	As Russia probe looms, Roger Stone touts relationship to WikiLeaks

	As questions swirl around possible connections to President Donald Trump's campaign and Russia, his friend, Roger Stone, has retraced the line between himself and WikiLeaks.

	Over the weekend, the longtime Trump confidant tweeted that he had a "back channel" to WikiLeaks during the presidential campaign -- only to later delete it.

	...Last weekend's Twitter flare-up raised questions anew about Stone, who worked for the Trump campaign in 2015 and claims to have a connection to WikiLeaks and its leader, Julian Assange. 

	..."I do have a back-channel communication with Assange because we have a good mutual friend," he said in the October interview.

	..."I have no Russian clients. I have no Russian contacts, I have no Russian money. I have no Russian influences. I do like Russian vodka," Stone told Time in an interview published early February.

	Stone has known Trump for decades, dating back to when he said the two connected through attorney Roy Cohn -- who gained notoriety as an ally of Sen. Joseph McCarthy -- before establishing a business relationship. He was initially part of Trump's campaign before the two split ways amid disputed circumstances in August 2015. Later on in the campaign, Stone went on to start a super PAC in support of Trump as well as keep a line of communication open.


https://www.mediamatters.org/video/2017/03/14/cbs-evening-news-trump-ally-roger-stone-contacted-russian-hacker-least-16-times-during-2016-campaign/215681
	CBS Evening News: Trump Ally Roger Stone Contacted Russian Hacker "At Least 16 Times During The 2016 Campaign"

	Roger Stone: "That's Called Networking"


http://www.rawstory.com/2017/05/alex-jones-blames-leather-daddy-hr-mcmaster-for-russia-leaks-in-bizarre-shaved-heads-rant/
	Conspiracy theorist Alex Jones and right-wing gadfly Roger Stone suggested national security adviser H.R. McMaster was a gay “leather daddy” during a bizarre InfoWars discussion.

	The pair blamed McMaster and other national security officials for damaging leaks on President Donald Trump blurting out highly classified intelligence to senior Russian officials, and they suggested the White House was under attack by Obama and Clinton loyalists.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/21/us/roger-stone-donald-trump-russia.html
	Roger Stone, the ‘Trickster’ on Trump’s Side, Is Under F.B.I. Scrutiny

	By MAGGIE HABERMAN MARCH 21, 2017 

	In President Trump’s oft-changing world order, Roger J. Stone Jr., the onetime political consultant and full-time provocateur, has been one of the few constants — a loyalist and self-proclaimed “dirty trickster” who nurtured the dream of a presidential run by the developer-turned-television-star for 30 years.

	...Mr. Stone, 64, is the best known of the Trump associates under scrutiny as part of an F.B.I. investigation into Russian interference in the election.


It really looks like Russia's intelligence services have a copy of Donald Trump's tax returns. That means they can blackmail him with his tax returns.

So, we know three important things about Mr. Trump:

1. He watches the media obsessively and knows how to communicate and "make deals" via the media
2. He knows how blackmail and coercion works (having essentially used blackmail before himself)
3. The Russians have his fishy tax returns


This might explain a few things in the above timeline, like this:


http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/tom-arnold-claims-journalists-are-looking-supposed-trump-apprentice-tapes-959302
	12:14 PM PST 12/26/2016 

	...Then the Russian hack happened. That and him lying about releasing his taxes. ...You have to see his taxes. ...Terrible career move but I believe if Russia has something they can blackmail our president


http://www.cnbc.com/2016/12/28/us-to-announce-new-sanctions-against-russia-in-response-to-election-hacking.html
	US to announce new sanctions against Russia in response to election hacking
	Wednesday, 28 Dec 2016 4:06 PM ET

	In response to Graham's statements, a spokeswoman for Russia's Foreign Ministry promised retaliation in the event of new economic sanctions.

	"To be honest, we are tired of lie about the 'Russian hackers', which is being poured down in the United States from the very top," Russia Foreign Ministry spokeswoman Maria Zakharova said.

	She also called reports of possible new sanctions a "provocation directed by the White House".


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14I05A?il=0
	Wed Dec 28, 2016 
	Asked about Russia sanctions, Trump says 'we ought to get on with our lives'

	...Asked by reporters if the United States should sanction Russia, Trump replied: "I think we ought to get on with our lives. I think that computers have complicated lives very greatly. The whole age of computer has made it where nobody knows exactly what's going on."

	...Trump said he was not familiar with remarks earlier on Wednesday by Republican Senator Lindsey Graham, who said Russia and President Vladimir Putin should expect tough sanctions for the cyber attacks.


Or this:


http://www.washingtonexaminer.com/putin-hopes-trump-will-lift-sanctions-says-no-need-to-rush-retaliation/article/2610560
	Putin hopes Trump will lift sanctions, says 'no need to rush' retaliation
	Dec 29, 2016, 4:26 PM 

	..."Considering the current transition period in Washington, we still expect that we'll be able to get rid of such clumsy actions," Putin's spokesman Dmitry Peskov said, per RT, a Kremlin-funded media outlet.

	Peskov suggested that Putin might delay Russian payback over the sanctions until after Trump takes office, saying "there's no need to rush" the retaliation. "As it said before, we consider this decision and these sanctions unjustified and illegal under international law," Peskov said.


https://twitter.com/TomArnold/status/814653874862571520
	Hey gamers here's a challenge. Trumps taxes are behind this door. Let's Make America Great Again

	6:06 PM - 29 Dec 2016


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-russian-cyberattacks-intelligence-233045
	Trump: It's time 'to move on' from claims of Russian interference in election

	12/29/2016 06:14 PM EST

	...“It's time for our country to move on to bigger and better things,” he said in a statement. “Nevertheless, in the interest of our country and its great people, I will meet with leaders of the intelligence community next week in order to be updated on the facts of this situation.”


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-russia-idUSKBN14X1YX
	Trump adviser had five calls with Russian envoy on day of sanctions: sources

 	Michael Flynn, President-elect Donald Trump's choice for national security adviser, held five phone calls with Russia's ambassador to Washington on the day the United States retaliated for Moscow's interference in the U.S. presidential election, three sources familiar with the matter said.

	The calls occurred between the time the Russian embassy was told about U.S. sanctions and the announcement by Russian President Vladimir Putin that he had decided against reprisals, said the sources. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/814919370711461890?lang=en
	Great move on delay (by V. Putin) - I always knew he was very smart!
	11:41 AM - 30 Dec 2016 


Or this:


http://www.newsweek.com/russias-lavrov-warns-master-deal-trump-putin-can-negotiate-too-548513
	1/26/17 at 11:03 AM 

	Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov has told parliament in his home country that although Donald Trump boasts of being a “master of the deal,” Russia’s own leader is also no slouch in getting the best results for Russia.

	Lavrov spoke in the lower house of parliament Thursday, referring to Donald Trump’s speech at his presidential inauguration last week, when he declared his prime policy would be “America first.” While Putin and Trump have voiced a willingness to improve their countries’ relationship, they are yet to settle on a date for a meeting.


http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/316382-petition-demanding-trumps-tax-returns-gets-record-number-of
	Petition for Trump’s tax returns gets record number of signatures
	By Max Greenwood - 01/26/17 04:59 PM EST 


http://www.nbcnews.com/politics/white-house/trump-putin-speak-phone-weekend-n712851
	Jan 27 2017, 12:36 am ET
	Trump and Putin to Speak by Phone This Weekend

 	President Donald Trump will speak with Russian President Vladimir Putin by phone this weekend, an administration official familiar with the planning said.


Or this:


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/trump-talks-with-putin-merkel-foreign-leaders-phone-calls/
	Last Updated Jan 28, 2017 8:58 PM EST

	In a Kremlin statement, Russia also mentioned that the leaders spoke about plans to organize a summit for the two. The White House did not confirm the information in their own readout of the call. 

	Vice President Mike Pence, chief of staff Reince Priebus, chief White House strategist Steve Bannon and National Security Adviser Michael Flynn were in the Oval Office during the call. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/01/30/russia-putin-trump-could-meet-before-july/97234574/
	Russia: Putin, Trump could meet before July

	Published 8:05 a.m. ET Jan. 30, 2017

	Russian President Vladimir Putin could meet face-to-face with President Trump before July, after the two leaders held an hour-long phone conversation over the weekend, a presidential spokesman said.

	Dmitry Peskov, Putin’s spokesman, told Russian news agency TASS that the two could “quite likely” meet before a Group of 20 summit in Hamburg, Germany on July 7-8. He said he hoped the leaders’ aides will "waste no time" in preparing.


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/07/04/putin-trump-to-meet-in-hamburg-on-july-7-says-russian-news-agency.html
	Tuesday, 4 Jul 2017 | 6:56 AM ET

	A meeting between Russian President Vladimir Putin and his U.S. counterpart Donald Trump will take place on the sidelines of a G-20 summit in Hamburg on July 7, Russian news agencies quoted Kremlin foreign policy aide Yuri Ushakov as saying on Tuesday.

	"(It's been) agreed for the seventh," RIA news agency quoted him as saying. 


Or this:


http://www.cbsnews.com/news/putin-spokesman-unconditional-support-for-assad-not-possible/
 	April 6, 2017, 4:33 PM
	Putin spokesman: Russian support for Assad has its limits

	President Vladimir Putin’s spokesman Dmitry Peskov said in an interview that “unconditional support is not possible in this current world.” 

	But he added that “it is not correct to say that Moscow can convince Mr. Assad to do whatever is wanted in Moscow. This is totally wrong.”


https://www.whitehouse.gov/the-press-office/2017/04/06/statement-president-trump-syria
	Statement by President Trump on Syria

	April 06, 2017

	Tonight, I ordered a targeted military strike on the airfield in Syria from where the chemical attack was launched.  It is in this vital national security interest of the United States to prevent and deter the spread and use of deadly chemical weapons.

	...Goodnight.  And God bless America and the entire world.  Thank you.


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-mideast-crisis-syria-idUSKBN1782S0
	Sat Apr 8, 2017 | 9:06am EDT
	Russia warns of serious consequences from U.S. strike in Syria

	Russia warned on Friday that U.S. cruise missile strikes on a Syrian air base could have "extremely serious" consequences, as President Donald Trump's first major foray into a foreign conflict opened up a rift between Moscow and Washington.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/10/world/middleeast/syria-trump-assad.html
	On Trump’s Syria Strategy, One Voice Is Missing: Trump’s
	APRIL 10, 2017

	WASHINGTON — In the days since President Trump ordered a cruise missile strike against Syria in retaliation for a chemical attack on civilians, his administration has spoken with multiple voices as it seeks to explain its evolving policy. But one voice has not been heard from: that of Mr. Trump himself.


http://thehill.com/policy/international/middle-east-north-africa/328165-us-determines-russia-knew-of-chemical-weapons
	WH disputes report Russia knew of chemical attack in Syria beforehand
	By Mallory Shelbourne - 04/10/17 04:26 PM EDT 

	The Associated Press reported Monday that the United States determined that Russia knew about last week’s chemical attack on a town in Syria beforehand.

	But in a Monday evening statement, a senior administration official disputed that report. 


Communicating (vague) threats via media is a way to blackmail someone with plausibly deniability. Consider that if Putin tried to blackmail Trump over, say, a "secret back channel" directly connecting the two, discovery of the backchannel would raise suspicion and spoil the blackmail scheme.

With that in mind, it's worth revisiting the previously mentioned Russian propaganda narrative accusing the Washington post of being a CIA front (with Jeff Bezos involved somehow). Trump has a habit of retweeting Russian fake news stories, and it looks like he actually believes some of them. In particular, it looks like he believes the one about U.S. intelligence agencies having a special relationship with the Washington Post:


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/339801-trump-rips-amazonwashingtonpost-as-fake-news
	President Trump on Wednesday attacked The Washington Post and its owner, Amazon founder Jeff Bezos, for its coverage of him and his administration. 

	“The #AmazonWashingtonPost, sometimes referred to as the guardian of Amazon not paying internet taxes (which they should) is FAKE NEWS!” the president tweeted Wednesday morning. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673881733415178240
	The @washingtonpost, which loses a fortune, is owned by @JeffBezos for purposes of keeping taxes down at his no profit company, @amazon.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673884271954776064
	The @washingtonpost loses   money (a deduction) and gives owner @JeffBezos power to screw public on low taxation of @Amazon! Big tax shelter
	7:18 AM - 7 Dec 2015 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/673885376742825984
	If @amazon ever had to pay fair taxes, its stock would crash and it would crumble like a paper bag. The @washingtonpost scam is saving it!
	7:22 AM - 7 Dec 2015 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/831840306161123328
	Information is being illegally given to the failing @nytimes & @washingtonpost by the intelligence community (NSA and FBI?).Just like Russia
	4:19 AM - 15 Feb 2017 


This might explain some of the apparent back and forth between Trump and WaPo (and NY Times):


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/national-security-adviser-flynn-discussed-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador-despite-denials-officials-say/2017/02/09/f85b29d6-ee11-11e6-b4ff-ac2cf509efe5_story.html
 	National security adviser Flynn discussed sanctions with Russian ambassador, despite denials, officials say 

	By Greg Miller, Adam Entous and Ellen Nakashima February 9


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/justice-department-warned-white-house-that-flynn-could-be-vulnerable-to-russian-blackmail-officials-say/2017/02/13/fc5dab88-f228-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Justice Department warned White House that Flynn could be vulnerable to Russian blackmail, officials say 

	By Adam Entous, Ellen Nakashima and Philip Rucker February 13


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/02/13/us/politics/document-Michael-Flynn-Resignation-Letter.html
	Michael Flynn’s Resignation Letter

	February 13


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-condemns-leaks-to-news-media-in-a-twitter-flurry.html
	Flynn Was Brought Down by Illegal Leaks to News Media, Trump Says
	FEB. 15, 2017

	President Trump lashed out at the nation’s intelligence agencies again on Wednesday, saying that his former national security adviser, Michael T. Flynn, was brought down by illegal leaks to the news media, on a day of new disclosures about the Trump camp’s dealings with Russia during and after the presidential campaign.

	“From intelligence, papers are being leaked, things are being leaked,” Mr. Trump said at a White House news conference with Benjamin Netanyahu, the prime minister of Israel. “It’s a criminal action, criminal act, and it’s been going on for a long time before me, but now it’s really going on. And people are trying to cover up for a terrible loss that the Democrats had under Hillary Clinton.”


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/02/15/us/politics/trump-intelligence-agencies-stephen-feinberg.html
	White House Plans to Have Trump Ally Review Intelligence Agencies

	By JAMES RISEN and MATTHEW ROSENBERGFEB. 15, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — President Trump plans to assign a New York billionaire to lead a broad review of American intelligence agencies, according to administration officials, an effort that members of the intelligence community fear could curtail their independence and reduce the flow of information that contradicts the president’s worldview.

	The possible role for Stephen A. Feinberg, a co-founder of Cerberus Capital Management, has met fierce resistance among intelligence officials already on edge 


http://www.latimes.com/politics/la-na-pol-trump-news-conference-transcript-20170216-story.html
	FEBRUARY 16, 2017, 2:55 PM

	QUESTION: Can we ask what you're going to do and also, we've heard about a -- a review of the intelligence community headed up by Steven Feinberg, what can you tell us about that?

	TRUMP: Well, first of all about that, we now have Dan Coats, hopefully soon, Mike Pompeo and James Comey and they're in position so I hope that we'll be able to straighten that out without using anybody else.

	...QUESTION: Thank you. I was just hoping that we could get a yes or no answer on one of these questions involving Russia. Can you say whether you are aware that anyone who advised your campaign had contacts with Russia during the course of the election?

	TRUMP: Well I told you, Gen. Flynn obviously was dealing. So that's one person. But he was dealing, as he should have been.

	QUESTION: During the election?

	TRUMP: No. Nobody that I know of. Nobody...

	QUESTION: So you're not aware of any contact during the course..

	TRUMP: Look, look, look...

	QUESTION: ... of the election?

	TRUMP: How many times do I have to answer this question?

	QUESTION: Can you just say yes or no?

	TRUMP: Russia is a ruse.

	I know you have to get up and ask a question. It's so important.

	Russia is a ruse. I have nothing to do with Russia.

	...TRUMP: Mike Flynn is a fine person, and I asked for his resignation. He respectfully gave it. He is a man who there was a certain amount of information given to Vice President Pence, who is with us today. And I was not happy with the way that information was given.

	He didn't have to do that, because what he did wasn't wrong -- what he did in terms of the information he saw.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170216214656/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/flynn-in-fbi-interview-denied-discussing-sanctions-with-russian-ambassador/2017/02/16/e3e1e16a-f3d5-11e6-8d72-263470bf0401_story.html
	Flynn in FBI interview denied discussing sanctions with Russian ambassador 

	By Sari Horwitz and Adam Entous February 16 at 4:37 PM


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/832708293516632065
	The FAKE NEWS media (failing @nytimes, @NBCNews, @ABC, @CBS, @CNN) is not my enemy, it is the enemy of the American People!
	1:48 PM - 17 Feb 2017 


But what's really interesting is how some of WaPo's and NYT's stories line-up with Trump's meetings with Comey. For instance, after the above leaks brought down Flynn, Trump singled-out Comey in the Oval Office to complain about leaks and tell him "I hope you can see your way to letting Flynn go," as if Trump thought Comey himself was somehow involved with the leaks, or could control them.

There is some evidence that Trump actually thinks Comey was behind the leaks. Trump accuses Comey of being a "leaker" after firing him, for one:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/864452996129853444
	I have been asking Director Comey & others, from the beginning of my administration, to find the LEAKERS in the intelligence community.....
	5:10 AM - 16 May 2017


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873120139222306817
	Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication...and WOW, Comey is a leaker!
	3:10 AM - 9 Jun 2017 


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/873879934040780801
	I believe the James Comey leaks will be far more prevalent than anyone ever thought possible. Totally illegal? Very 'cowardly!'
	5:29 AM - 11 Jun 2017 


And this curious article claims to have discovered James Comey's twitter account, which follows, among other people, some of the same WaPo authors behind the Russia leaks:


http://gizmodo.com/this-is-almost-certainly-james-comey-s-twitter-account-1793843641
	ProjectExile7 follows 27 other accounts, the majority of which are either reporters, news outlets, or official government and law enforcement accounts. The New York Times’ Adam Goldman and David Sanger and the Washington Post’s Ellen Nakashima and David Ignatius, all of whom have been aggressively covering the FBI investigation into Trump’s contacts with Russian agents, made the list, as did Wittes and former Bush Administration colleague Jack Goldsmith. Donald Trump is on there


It's unclear if Trump ever saw this twitter account, but he might be unsophisticated enough to actually believe it actually belongs to James Comey (Comey "friend" Benjamin Wittes sort-of backs it up). Either way, it does look like Trump thinks Comey is somehow associated with these leaks.

The leaks leading up to the January 27th dinner between Trump and Comey tell a lot. First, several potentially relevant events lead up to the dinner:

- Trump has blamed the leak of the dossier on the IC, and appears to think U.S. intelligence agencies are leaking information on the Russia investigation out of hostility toward him.

- The Trump administration denied coordinating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador and claimed they were innocuous, but the circumstances surrounding the calls hint at criminality or wrongdoing by Trump.

- Comey assured Trump he was not under investigation and refused to confirm the Russia investigation, and Trump has acted friendly toward Comey after others called for his resignation.

- According to Comey, Trump had asked Comey to stay on during the January 6th briefing, before the calls for Comey to resign. Comey also assured Trump he was not under investigation during this briefing.

- Trump has not yet said publicly he intends to keep Comey on as FBI director. He told 60 minutes he wanted to speak with Comey after the election first.

- Meanwhile, Trump has been briefed that Wikileaks is affiliated with Russian intelligence, and Wikileaks has threatened to release Trump's tax returns.


One mystery about Trump's and Comey's accounts of the Jan 27 dinner is: why can't they agree on who initiated it?


https://www.realclearpolitics.com/video/2017/05/11/president_trumps_full_interview_with_lester_holt.html
	TRUMP: I had a dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. We had a very nice dinner at the White House...

	HOLT: He -- he asked...

	(CROSSTALK)

	TRUMP: ...very early on. That dinner was arranged. I think he asked for the dinner.

	And he wanted to stay on as the FBI head. And I said I'll, you know, consider. We'll see what happens.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/08/full-text-james-comey-trump-russia-testimony-239295
	KING: With regard to the — several of these conversations, in his interview with Lester Holt on NBC, the president said, I had dinner with him. He wanted to have dinner because he wanted to stay on. Is this an accurate statement?

	COMEY: No, sir.

	KING: Did you in any way initiate that dinner?

	COMEY: No. He called me at my desk at lunchtime and asked me, was I free for dinner that night. Called himself. Said, can you come over for dinner tonight? I said, yes, sir. He said, will 6:00 work? I think 6:00 first. Then he said, I was going to invite your whole family but we'll do it next time. Is that a good time? I said, sir, whatever works for you. He said, how about 6:30? I said, whatever works for you, sir. Then I hung up and had to call my wife and break a date with her. I was supposed to take her to dinner that night.

	KING: One of the all-time great excuses for breaking a date.

	COMEY: Yeah. In retrospect, I love spending time with my wife and I wish I would have been there that night. 


Trump says Comey asked him for the dinner because he "wanted to stay on as the FIB head." Comey says Trump asked him for the dinner and he really didn't want to go.

One explanation lies in the media reports in WaPo and NYT starting a few days earlier:


https://www.wsj.com/articles/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-to-russia-1485134942
https://www.dowjones.com/scoops/u-s-eyes-michael-flynns-links-russia/
	U.S. Eyes Michael Flynn’s Links to Russia
	By Carol E. Lee, Devlin Barrett and Shane Harris
	Jan. 22, 2017 8:29 p.m. ET 

	Counterintelligence agents have investigated communications by President Trump’s national security adviser, including phone calls to Russian ambassador in late December

	Michael Flynn is the first person inside the White House under Mr. Trump whose communications are known to have faced scrutiny as part of investigations by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Central Intelligence Agency, National Security Agency and Treasury Department to determine the extent of Russian government contacts with people close to Mr. Trump.

	It isn’t clear when the counterintelligence inquiry began, whether it produced any incriminating evidence or if it is continuing. Mr. Flynn, a retired general who became national security adviser with Mr. Trump’s inauguration, plays a key role in setting U.S. policy toward Russia.

	The counterintelligence inquiry aimed to determine the nature of Mr. Flynn’s contact with Russian officials and whether such contacts may have violated laws, people familiar with the matter said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-reviewed-flynns-calls-with-russian-ambassador-but-found-nothing-illicit/2017/01/23/aa83879a-e1ae-11e6-a547-5fb9411d332c_story.html
 	FBI reviewed Flynn’s calls with Russian ambassador but found nothing illicit 

	By Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 23

	The FBI in late December reviewed intercepts of communications between the Russian ambassador to the United States and retired Lt. Gen. Michael T. Flynn — national security adviser to then-President-elect Trump — but has not found any evidence of wrongdoing or illicit ties to the Russian government, U.S. officials said. 

	...Although Flynn’s contacts with Russian Ambassador Sergey Kislyak were listened to, Flynn himself is not the active target of an investigation, U.S. officials said. The Wall Street Journal reported Sunday that U.S. counterintelligence agents had investigated the communications between Flynn and Kislyak.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/01/24/us/politics/trump-comey-fbi-director-.html
	Trump Is Said to Keep James Comey as F.B.I. Director

	By MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT and ADAM GOLDMAN JAN. 24, 2017 

	WASHINGTON — The F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, told his top agents from around the country that he had been asked by President Trump to stay on the job running the federal government’s top law enforcement agency, according to people familiar with the matter.

	...When Mr. Comey and the president-elect met at Trump Tower for the first time this month for an intelligence briefing, Mr. Trump told the F.B.I. director that he hoped he would remain in his position, according to people briefed on the matter. And Mr. Trump’s aides have made it clear to Mr. Comey that the president does not plan to ask him to leave, these people said.


https://web.archive.org/web/20170124155639/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-director-james-comey-to-say-on-in-trump-administration/2017/01/24/033d3bc8-e246-11e6-a453-19ec4b3d09ba_story.html?utm_term=.13d7738addb2
 	FBI Director James Comey to stay on in Trump administration

	By Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller January 24 at 10:21 AM 

	...The news that Comey would stay in place became public Tuesday, some time after he began informing senior FBI officials around the country that he had been asked to continue.

	Under normal circumstances, the revelation might have been unsurprising: Comey is less than four years into a 10-year term, and it is extremely rare for a president to remove an FBI director. But President Trump had notably declined to say whether he would keep the FBI director, telling “60 Minutes” in an interview after his election that he wanted to meet with Comey first. 


Assuming Trump is watching the media like a hawk as usual, Trump learns the following leading up to the dinner:


- Carol Lee, Devlin Barrett, and Shane Harris of The Wall Street Journal report on Jan 22 that multiple U.S. intelligence agencies are investigating Flynn's contacts with the Russian ambassador.

- Ellen Nakashima and Greg Miller of The Washington Post report on Jan 23 that the FBI found no wronging and Flynn is not under investigation.

- Matt Zapotosky, Ellen Nakashima, and Greg Miller of The Washington Post and Adam Goldman of the NY Times report on Jan 24 that Trump intends to keep Comey as FBI Director.


But Trump hasn't publicly confirmed he wants Comey as FBI director yet, and Comey has recently faced calls for his resignation. On top of that, Trump has reasons to believe the WSJ report that Flynn is under investigation is legitimate: for one, he probably directed Flynn's calls and knows their contents. And  Trump has said the Wall Street Journal and "financial media" are "much better, much more honest" than "the political media," and the Trump campaign had previously revoked The Washington Post's press credentials for "incredibly inaccurate coverage."

For a man who sees patterns and deals being made over the media (and perhaps fancies himself a mob boss), it wouldn't be too hard for Trump to interpret these Washington Post reports as an offer for a deal by Comey--essentially, keep me as FBI director and the investigation into you goes away. Trump would notice the conspicuous disconnected between the WaPo report and the WSJ report, and would certainly notice if the Washington Post learned that he accepted Comey as FBI director before he did. Trump might also have picked up that Flynn had been interviewed by the FBI within a few hours of Comey's January 24th "job offer."

Yates perhaps throws a wrench in this deal. Two days after the supposed Comey "offer," Yates warns Trump that Flynn is vulnerable to blackmail, then invites him to review the evidence underlying his conduct. But this would surely inconvenience any supposed deal to make Flynn's investigation "disappear," as the WaPo article enticed, as Trump would have a hard time pretending the investigation didn't exist with knowledge of both the investigation and the underlying evidence. Trump will later claim he was "surprised" by Yates warning, having "read various articles" that Flynn was "just doing his job."

Trump goes on to hastily create an alibi to fire Yates, his conspicuously unconstitutional travel ban, surprising Yates and everybody else with its roll-out and causing global chaos. Trump asks Comey if he's not under investigation, threatens to investigate the dossier then asks for his loyalty. Comey tells Trump he's not under investigation, and he'll get "honest loyalty." Comey keeps his job.


The same set of authors at the Washington Post will go on to leak some details of Flynn's misconduct, prompting Trump to fire Flynn and confront Comey. Trump will ask Comey to make public he's not under investigation, reminding him he's been "loyal" to Comey and that "we had that thing you know." Trump will complain that leaks from the intelligence community are affecting his ability to "make deals," perhaps referring to deals with Russia:


https://web.archive.org/web/20170412000123/https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/fbi-obtained-fisa-warrant-to-monitor-former-trump-adviser-carter-page/2017/04/11/620192ea-1e0e-11e7-ad74-3a742a6e93a7_story.html
	FBI obtained FISA warrant to monitor former Trump adviser Carter Page
	By Ellen Nakashima, Devlin Barrett and Adam Entous
 	April 11 at 7:11 PM

	The FBI obtained a secret court order last summer to monitor the communications of an adviser to presidential candidate Donald Trump, part of an investigation into possible links between Russia and the campaign, law enforcement and other U.S. officials said.

	The FBI and the Justice Department obtained the warrant targeting Carter Page’s communications after convincing a Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court judge that there was probable cause to believe Page was acting as an agent of a foreign power, in this case Russia, according to the officials. 

	...Applications for FISA warrants, Comey said, are often thicker than his wrists, and that thickness represents all the work Justice Department attorneys and FBI agents have to do to convince a judge that such surveillance is appropriate in an investigation. 


http://thehill.com/homenews/administration/328590-trump-reinforces-turnaround-on-syria-and-russia
	Trump reinforces turnaround on Syria and Russia
	04/12/17

	Asked if he thought Russia knew of the sarin nerve gas attack that the U.S. and its allies have pinned on Syrian President Bashar Assad, whose government has been facing armed opposition in a yearslong civil war, Trump hedged.

	“I think it's certainly possible. I think it's probably unlikely,” he said. “I would like to think that they didn't know, but certainly they could have.”

	...Trump has been signaling a more aggressive and antagonistic approach to Syria and Russia, Assad’s primary backer, since the chemical attack — moving away from his campaign promises to forge better ties with Moscow and to avoid U.S. military interventions in the Middle East. 


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-russia-tillerson-putin-idUSKBN17E11W
	Wed Apr 12, 2017

	Putin says U.S.-Russia ties worse since Trump took office

	Levels of trust between Moscow and Washington have deteriorated since U.S. President Donald Trump took office, Russian President Vladimir Putin said in an interview broadcast on Wednesday.

	Asked about relations since Trump became president, Putin said, according to a transcript of the interview released by the Kremlin: "One could say that the level of trust on a working level, especially on the military level, has not improved, but rather has deteriorated."

	Asked about accusations that Syria's government launched a chemical weapons attack in Idlib province, Putin said that Damascus had given up its chemical weapons stocks.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/852510810287075329
	Things will work out fine between the U.S.A. and Russia. At the right time everyone will come to their senses & there will be lasting peace!
	6:16 AM - 13 Apr 2017 


Comey tells Trump he'll "look into" Trump's request to "get out" that he's under investigation, but never does.

Why does Trump fire Comey? We can only guess, but it might have something to do with this:


http://thehill.com/blogs/floor-action/senate/331486-gop-senator-questions-comey-over-inconsistencies-on-trump-dossier
	GOP senator questions Comey over 'inconsistencies' on Trump dossier
	By Jordain Carney - 05/01/17 

	..."There appear to be material inconsistencies between the description of the FBI’s relationship with Mr. Steele that you did provide in your briefing and information contained in Justice Department documents made available to the Committee only after the briefing," Grassley wrote in the letter dated April 28. 


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/inside-the-oval-office-with-trump-and-the-russians-broad-smiles-and-loose-lips/2017/05/16/2e8b0d14-3a66-11e7-8854-21f359183e8c_story.html
	On May 2, eight days before Lavrov showed up at the White House, Russian President Vladimir Putin was on the phone with Trump and made a request. ­Putin had “new ideas” about stopping the civil war carnage in Syria, according to a senior U.S. official, and noted that his top diplomat, Lavrov, would soon be visiting the United States for a previously scheduled meeting with Secretary of State Rex Tillerson.

	“Will you see him?” Putin asked Trump, according to the official, who spoke on the condition of anonymity to describe the private talks.

	“Yes,” Trump replied.


http://dailycaller.com/2017/05/06/roger-stone-still-talks-with-president-trump/
	05/06/2017 

	WASHINGTON–Republican political operative Roger Stone says he still communicates with President Donald Trump and the last conversation he had was relatively recent.

	...“I think the president and I understand that any conversation we had in October was monitored and I imagine my conversations these days are monitored, so we keep it pretty general. 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/19/us/politics/trump-russia-comey.html?smid=tw-share&_r=1
	WASHINGTON — President Trump told Russian officials in the Oval Office this month that firing the F.B.I. director, James B. Comey, had relieved “great pressure” on him, according to a document summarizing the meeting.

	“I just fired the head of the F.B.I. He was crazy, a real nut job,” Mr. Trump said, according to the document, which was read to The New York Times by an American official. “I faced great pressure because of Russia. That’s taken off.”


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/10/comey-firing-trump-russia-238192
	Behind Comey’s firing: An enraged Trump, fuming about Russia 

	While shock dominated much of the FBI and the White House, the mood at Roger Stone’s house in Florida was one of elation. Several Stone allies and friends said Stone, a Trump associate who has been frequently mentioned in the investigation, encouraged the president to fire Comey in conversations in recent weeks.

	On Twitter, Stone signaled praise for the move by posting an image of Trump from “The Apprentice” saying, “You’re fired.”

	Stone declined to comment Tuesday night but said he was enjoying a fine cigar. 


So far, it seems that Trump's presidency has been a battle of blackmail between the USIC and Putin--at least in Trump's eyes--with the USIC pressuring Trump with the Russia investigation and Putin pressuring him with his tax returns. In the end, Trump decided to side with Russia. With the USIC's pesky leaks out of the way, Trump might think, he can finally make his Russian "deals" he promised us all long ago.


https://pastebin.com/vdzU2CYf
